Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Address. new text end new text begin "Address" means the complete mailing address, including the zip code. An individual may use either the individual's business address or home address. An association's address is the address from which the association conducts its business. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 10A.01, subdivision 26, is amended to read: Subd. 26. Noncampaign disbursement. (a) "Noncampaign disbursement" means a purchase or payment of money or anything of value made, or an advance of credit incurred, or a donation in kind received, by a principal campaign committee for any of the following purposes: (1) payment for accounting and legal services related to operating the candidate's campaign committee, serving in office, or security for the candidate or the candidate's immediate family, including but not limited to seeking and obtaining a harassment restraining order; (2) return of a contribution to the source; (3) repayment of a loan made to the principal campaign committee by that committee; (4) return of a public subsidy; (5) payment for food, beverages, and necessary utensils and supplies, entertainment, and facility rental for a fundraising event; (6) services for a constituent by a member of the legislature or a constitutional officer in the executive branch as provided in section 10A.173, subdivision 1; (7) payment for food and beverages consumed by a candidate or volunteers while they are engaged in campaign activities; (8) payment for food or a beverage consumed while attending a reception or meeting directly related to legislative duties; (9) payment of expenses incurred by elected or appointed leaders of a legislative caucus in carrying out their leadership responsibilities; (10) payment by a principal campaign committee of the candidate's expenses for serving in public office, other than for personal uses; (11) costs of child care for the candidate's children when campaigning; (12) fees paid to attend a campaign school; (13) costs of a postelection party during the election year when a candidate's name will no longer appear on a ballot or the general election is concluded, whichever occurs first; (14) interest on loans paid by a principal campaign committee on outstanding loans; (15) filing fees; (16) post-general election holiday or seasonal cards, thank-you notes, or advertisements in the news media mailed or published prior to the end of the election cycle; (17) the cost of campaign material purchased to replace defective campaign material, if the defective material is destroyed without being used; (18) contributions to a party unit; (19) payments for funeral gifts or memorials; (20) the cost of a magnet less than six inches in diameter containing legislator contact information and distributed to constituents; (21) costs associated with a candidate attending a political party state or national convention in this state; (22) other purchases or payments specified in board rules or advisory opinions as being for any purpose other than to influence the nomination or election of a candidate or to promote or defeat a ballot question; (23) costs paid to a third party for processing contributions made by a credit card, debit card, or electronic check; (24) costs paid by a candidate's principal campaign committee to support the candidate's participation in a recount of ballots affecting the candidate's election; (25) a contribution to a fund established to support a candidate's participation in a recount of ballots affecting that candidate's election; (26) costs paid by a candidate's principal campaign committee for a single reception given in honor of the candidate's retirement from public office after the filing period for affidavits of candidacy for that office has closed; (27) a donation from a terminating principal campaign committee to the state general fund; (28) a donation from a terminating principal campaign committee to a county obligated to incur special election expenses due to that candidate's resignation from state office; (29) during a period starting January 1 in the year following a general election and ending on December 31 of the year of general election, total payments of up to deleted text begin $3,000deleted text end new text begin $5,000new text end fornew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end detection-related security monitoring expenses for a candidate, including home security hardware, maintenance of home security monitoring hardware, identity theft monitoring services, and credit monitoring services;new text begin andnew text end new text begin (ii) purchase, installation, and maintenance of structural security devices such as locks, wiring, lighting, gates, doors, and fencing so long as such devices are intended solely to provide security and not to improve the property or increase its value; new text end (30) new text begin during a period starting January 1 in the year following a general election and ending on December 31 of the year of a general election, total payments of up to $25,000 for security services, including security services provided by a political party unit as an in-kind contribution; new text end new text begin (31) new text end costs paid to repair or replace campaign property that was: (i) lost or stolen, or (ii) damaged or defaced to such a degree that the property no longer serves its intended purpose. For purposes of this clause, campaign property includes but is not limited to campaign lawn signs. The candidate must document the need for these costs in writing or with photographs; and deleted text begin (31)deleted text end new text begin (32)new text end transition expenses and inaugural event expenses as defined in section 10A.174. (b) The board must determine whether an activity involves a noncampaign disbursement within the meaning of this subdivision. (c) A noncampaign disbursement is considered to be made in the year in which the candidate made the purchase of goods or services or incurred an obligation to pay for goods or services. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 35d. new text end new text begin Security services. new text end new text begin (a) "Security services" means threat assessments, security guards, or guest screening services needed to address specific security concerns that result from the individual's position as a public official or state or local candidate that are provided by: new text end new text begin (1) a state or local law enforcement agency; or new text end new text begin (2) an insured vendor licensed by the Board of Private Detective and Protective Agent Services under sections 326.32 to 326.339. new text end new text begin (b) Security services do not include: new text end new text begin (1) services obtained from a relative or a business owned by a relative, within the third degree of consanguinity, of an official or candidate; or new text end new text begin (2) services obtained above fair market value. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36a. new text end new text begin Street address. new text end new text begin "Street address" means the name or number of the building, the name of the street on which the building is located, and any unit number. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 10A.02, subdivision 11b, is amended to read: Subd. 11b. Data privacy related to electronic reporting system. (a) The board may develop and maintain systems to enable deleted text begin treasurersdeleted text end new text begin individualsnew text end to enter and store electronic records online for the purpose of complying with this chapter. Data entered into such systems deleted text begin by treasurers or their authorized agentsdeleted text end is not government data under chapter 13 and may not be accessed or used by the board for any purpose without the deleted text begin treasurer'sdeleted text end written consentnew text begin of the filer to whom the data pertainsnew text end . Data from such systems that has been submitted to the board as a filed report new text begin or statement new text end is government data under chapter 13. (b) For purposes of administering the refund under section 290.06, subdivision 23, the board may access or use the following data entered and stored in an electronic reporting system and share the data with the commissioner of revenue: (1) the amount of the contribution; (2) the name and address of the contributor; (3) any unique identifier for the contribution; (4) the name and campaign identification number of the party or candidate that received the contribution; and (5) the date on which the contribution was received. Data accessed, used, or maintained by the board under this paragraph are classified as nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, and private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11c. new text end new text begin Street address data. new text end new text begin The street address of individuals contained on reports and statements filed with the board under sections 10A.09, subdivision 5, paragraph (a), clause (1); 10A.09, subdivision 5b, paragraph (b), clause (1); 10A.155; 10A.179; 10A.20; and 10A.202, are classified as nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, or as private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, and in addition to the subject of the data are accessible to the filer of the report or statement containing that data. The board, a county attorney, or a county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision may use street addresses disclosed on reports and statements to ensure compliance with this chapter. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.027, is amended to read: 10A.027 INFORMATION ON WEBSITE. new text begin (a)new text end The board must not post on its website any canceled checks, bank account numbers, credit card account numbers, or Social Security numbers that may be in the board's possession as a result of report or statement filings, complaints, or other proceedings under this chapter. new text begin (b) To comply with section 10A.02, subdivision 11c, the board must modify a report or statement to omit private or nonpublic data before posting the report or statement on its website. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 10A.04, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Content. (a) A report under this section must include information the board requires from the registration form and the information required by this subdivision for the reporting period. (b) A lobbyist must report the specific subjects of interest for an entity represented by the lobbyist on each report submitted under this section. A lobbyist must describe a specific subject of interest in the report with enough information to show the particular issue of importance to the entity represented. (c) A lobbyist must report every state agency that had administrative action that the represented entity sought to influence during the reporting period. The lobbyist must report the specific subjects of interest for each administrative action and the revisor of statutes rule draft number assigned to the administrative rulemaking. (d) A lobbyist must report every political subdivision that considered official action that the represented entity sought to influence during the reporting period. The lobbyist must report the specific subjects of interest for each action. (e) A lobbyist must report general lobbying categories and up to four specific subjects of interest related to each general lobbying category on which the lobbyist attempted to influence legislative action during the reporting period. If the lobbyist attempted to influence legislative action on more than four specific subjects of interest for a general lobbying category, the lobbyist, in consultation with the represented entity, must determine which four specific subjects of interest were the entity's highest priorities during the reporting period and report only those four subjects. (f) A lobbyist must report the Public Utilities Commission project name for each rate setting, power plant and powerline siting, or granting of certification of need before the Public Utilities Commission that the represented entity sought to influence during the reporting period. (g) A lobbyist must report the amount and nature of each gift, item, or benefit, excluding contributions to a candidate, equal in value to $5 or more, given or paid to any official, as defined in section 10A.071, subdivision 1, by the lobbyist or an employer or employee of the lobbyist. The list must include thenew text begin official'snew text end name deleted text begin and address ofdeleted text end new text begin , title, and the government jurisdiction for which the official serves fornew text end each official to whom the gift, item, or benefit was given or paid and the date it was given or paid. (h) A lobbyist must report each original source of money in excess of $500 in any year used for the purpose of lobbying to influence legislative action, administrative action, or the official action of a political subdivision. The list must include the name, address, and employer, or, if self-employed, the occupation and principal place of business, of each payer of money in excess of $500. (i) On each report, a lobbyist must disclose the general lobbying categories that were lobbied on in the reporting period. (j) A lobbyist must report each expert witness that the lobbyist requested to communicate with public or local officials as described in section 10A.01, subdivision 21, paragraph (b), clause (9), and each finance professional who participated in conduit financing as described in section 10A.01, subdivision 21, paragraph (b), clause (7). The lobbyist must report the name of the expert witness or finance professional; the employer, if any, of the expert witness or finance professional; the government entity that received the communication from the expert witness or finance professional; and the specific subject on which the expert witness or finance professional communicated. The designated lobbyist must also report this information if the expert witness or finance professional is requested to communicate by the principal or association that the lobbyist represents. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.09, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Form; general requirements. (a) A statement of economic interest required by this section must be on a form prescribed by the board. Except as provided in subdivision 5b, the individual filing must provide the following information: (1) the individual's name, address, occupation, and principal place of business; (2) a listing of the name of each associated business and the nature of that association; (3) a listing of all real property within the state, excluding homestead property, in which the individual or the individual's spouse holds: (i) a fee simple interest, a mortgage, a contract for deed as buyer or seller, or an option to buy, whether direct or indirect, if the interest is valued in excess of $2,500; or (ii) an option to buy, if the property has a fair market value of more than $50,000; (4) a listing of all real property within the state in which a partnership of which the individual or the individual's spouse is a member holds: (i) a fee simple interest, a mortgage, a contract for deed as buyer or seller, or an option to buy, whether direct or indirect, if the individual's share of the partnership interest is valued in excess of $2,500; or (ii) an option to buy, if the property has a fair market value of more than $50,000. A listing under this clause or clause (3) must indicate the street address and the municipality or the section, township, range and approximate acreage, whichever applies, and the county in which the property is located; (5) a listing of any investments, ownership, or interests in property connected with pari-mutuel horse racing in the United States and Canada, including a racehorse, in which the individual directly or indirectly holds a partial or full interest or an immediate family member holds a partial or full interest; (6) a listing of the principal business or professional activity category of each business from which the individual or the individual's spouse receives more than $250 in any month during the reporting period as an employee, if the individual or the individual's spouse has an ownership interest of 25 percent or more in the business; (7) a listing of each principal business or professional activity category from which the individual or the individual's spouse received compensation of more than $2,500 in the past 12 months as an independent contractor; (8) a listing of the full name of each security with a value of more than $10,000 owned in part or in full by the individual or the individual's spouse, at any time during the reporting period; and (9) a listing of any contract, professional license, lease, or franchise that: (i) is held by the individual or the individual's spouse or any business in which the individual has an ownership interest of 25 percent or more; and (ii) is entered into with, or issued by, the government agency on which the individual serves as a public or local official. new text begin (b) For the purposes of paragraph (a), clauses (3) and (4), the board must classify as private data the street address of real property at which an individual or the individual's spouse lives on a permanent or temporary basis if the individual certifies for each address that the individual would have a reasonable fear for the individual's or individual's family's safety if the address were public data. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The business or professional categories for purposes of paragraph (a), clauses (6) and (7), must be the general topic headings used by the federal Internal Revenue Service for purposes of reporting self-employment income on Schedule C. This paragraph does not require an individual to report any specific code number from that schedule. Any additional principal business or professional activity category may only be adopted if the category is enacted by law. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For the purpose of calculating the amount of compensation received from any single source in a single month, the amount shall include the total amount received from the source during the month, whether or not the amount covers compensation for more than one month. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end For the purpose of determining the value of an individual's interest in real property, the value of the property is the market value shown on the property tax statement. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end For the purpose of this section, "date of appointment" means the effective date of appointment to a position. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end For the purpose of this section, "accepting employment as a public official" means the effective date of the appointment to the position, as stated in the appointing authority's notice to the board. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end The listings required in paragraph (a), clauses (3) to (9), must not identify whether the individual or the individual's spouse is associated with or owns the listed item. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.09, subdivision 5b, is amended to read: Subd. 5b. Form; exceptions for certain officials. (a) This subdivision applies to the following individuals: (1) a supervisor of a soil and water conservation district; (2) a manager of a watershed district; and (3) a member of a watershed management organization as defined under section 103B.205, subdivision 13. (b) Notwithstanding subdivision 5, paragraph (a), an individual listed in paragraph (a), must provide only the information listed below on a statement of economic interest: (1) the individual's name, address, occupation, and principal place of business; (2) a listing of any association, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other organized legal entity from which the individual receives compensation in excess of $250, except for actual and reasonable expenses, in any month during the reporting period as a director, officer, owner, member, partner, employer, or employee; (3) a listing of all real property within the state, excluding homestead property, in which the individual or the individual's spouse holds: (i) a fee simple interest, a mortgage, a contract for deed as buyer or seller, or an option to buy, whether direct or indirect, if the interest is valued in excess of $2,500; or (ii) an option to buy, if the property has a fair market value of more than $50,000; (4) a listing of all real property within the state in which a partnership of which the individual or the individual's spouse is a member holds: (i) a fee simple interest, a mortgage, a contract for deed as buyer or seller, or an option to buy, whether direct or indirect, if the individual's share of the partnership interest is valued in excess of $2,500; or (ii) an option to buy, if the property has a fair market value of more than $50,000. A listing under this clause or clause (3) must indicate the street address and the municipality or the section, township, range and approximate acreage, whichever applies, and the county in which the property is located; and (5) a listing of any contract, professional license, lease, or franchise that meets the following criteria: (i) it is held by the individual or the individual's spouse or any business in which the individual has an ownership interest of 25 percent or more; and (ii) it is entered into with, or issued by, the government agency on which the individual serves as a public or local official. (c) The listings required in paragraph (b), clauses (3) to (5), must not identify whether the individual or the individual's spouse is associated with or owns the listed item. (d) new text begin For the purposes of paragraph (b), clauses (3) and (4), the board must classify as private data the street address of real property at which an individual or the individual's spouse lives on a permanent or temporary basis if the individual certifies for each address that the individual would have a reasonable fear for the individual's or individual's family's safety if the address were public data.new text end new text begin (e) new text end If an individual listed in paragraph (a) also holds a public official position that is not listed in paragraph (a), the individual must file a statement of economic interest that includes the information specified in subdivision 5, paragraph (a). Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.20, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Contents of report. (a) The report required by this section must include each of the items listed in paragraphs (b) to (q) that are applicable to the filer. The board shall prescribe forms based on filer type indicating which of those items must be included on the filer's report. (b) The report must disclose the amount of liquid assets on hand at the beginning of the reporting period. (c) The report must disclose the name, address, employer, or occupation if self-employed, and registration number if registered with the board, of each individual or association that has made one or more contributions to the reporting entity, including the purchase of tickets for a fundraising effort, that in aggregate within the year exceed $200 for legislative or statewide candidates or more than $500 for ballot questions, together with the amount and date of each contribution, and the aggregate amount of contributions within the year from each source so disclosed. A donation in kind must be disclosed at its fair market value. An approved expenditure must be listed as a donation in kind. A donation in kind is considered consumed in the reporting period in which it is received. The names of contributors must be listed in alphabetical order. Contributions from the same contributor must be listed under the same name. When a contribution received from a contributor in a reporting period is added to previously reported unitemized contributions from the same contributor and the aggregate exceeds the disclosure threshold of this paragraph, the name, address, and employer, or occupation if self-employed, of the contributor must then be listed on the report. (d) The report must disclose the sum of contributions to the reporting entity during the reporting period. (e) The report must disclose each loan made or received by the reporting entity within the year in aggregate in excess of $200, continuously reported until repaid or forgiven, together with the name, address, occupation, principal place of business, if any, and registration number if registered with the board of the lender and any endorser and the date and amount of the loan. If a loan made to the principal campaign committee of a candidate is forgiven or is repaid by an entity other than that principal campaign committee, it must be reported as a contribution for the year in which the loan was made. (f) The report must disclose each receipt over $200 during the reporting period not otherwise listed under paragraphs (c) to (e). (g) The report must disclose the sum of all receipts of the reporting entity during the reporting period. (h) The report must disclose the name, address, and registration number if registered with the board of each individual or association to whom aggregate expenditures, approved expenditures, independent expenditures, and ballot question expenditures have been made by or on behalf of the reporting entity within the year in excess of $200, together with the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure, including an explanation of how the expenditure was used, and the name and deleted text begin addressdeleted text end new text begin the city, state, and zip codenew text end of, and office sought by, each candidate or local candidate on whose behalf the expenditure was made, identification of the ballot question that the expenditure was intended to promote or defeat and an indication of whether the expenditure was to promote or to defeat the ballot question, and in the case of independent expenditures made in opposition to a candidate or local candidate, the candidate's or local candidate's namedeleted text begin , address,deleted text end new text begin ; the city, state, and zip code;new text end and office sought. A reporting entity making an expenditure on behalf of more than one candidate or local candidate must allocate the expenditure among the candidates and local candidates on a reasonable cost basis and report the allocation for each candidate or local candidate. The report must list on separate schedules any independent expenditures made on behalf of local candidates and any expenditures made for ballot questions as defined in section 10A.01, subdivision 7, clause (2), (3), or (4). (i) The report must disclose the sum of all expenditures made by or on behalf of the reporting entity during the reporting period. (j) The report must disclose the amount and nature of an advance of credit incurred by the reporting entity, continuously reported until paid or forgiven. If an advance of credit incurred by the principal campaign committee of a candidate is forgiven by the creditor or paid by an entity other than that principal campaign committee, it must be reported as a donation in kind for the year in which the advance of credit was made. (k) The report must disclose the namedeleted text begin , address,deleted text end and registration number if registered with the board of each political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, local candidate, or party unit to which contributions have been made that aggregate in excess of $200 within the year and the amount and date of each contribution. new text begin The report must include the city, state, and zip code of each principal campaign committee and local candidate. The report must include the address of each political committee, political fund, and party unit. new text end The report must list on separate schedules any contributions made to state candidates' principal campaign committees and any contributions made to local candidates. (l) The report must disclose the sum of all contributions made by the reporting entity during the reporting period and must separately disclose the sum of all contributions made to local candidates by the reporting entity during the reporting period. (m) The report must disclose the name, address, and registration number if registered with the board of each individual or association to whom noncampaign disbursements have been made that aggregate in excess of $200 within the year by or on behalf of the reporting entity and the amount, date, and purpose of each noncampaign disbursement, including an explanation of how the expenditure was used. (n) The report must disclose the sum of all noncampaign disbursements made within the year by or on behalf of the reporting entity. (o) The report must disclose the name and address of a nonprofit corporation that provides administrative assistance to a political committee or political fund as authorized by section 211B.15, subdivision 17, the type of administrative assistance provided, and the aggregate fair market value of each type of assistance provided to the political committee or political fund during the reporting period. (p) Legislative, statewide, and judicial candidates, party units, and political committees and funds must itemize contributions that in aggregate within the year exceed $200 for legislative or statewide candidates or more than $500 for ballot questions on reports submitted to the board. The itemization must include the date on which the contribution was received, the individual or association that provided the contribution, and the address of the contributor. Additionally, the itemization for a donation in kind must provide a description of the item or service received. Contributions that are less than the itemization amount must be reported as an aggregate total. (q) Legislative, statewide, and judicial candidates, party units, political committees and funds, and committees to promote or defeat a ballot question must itemize expenditures and noncampaign disbursements that in aggregate exceed $200 in a calendar year on reports submitted to the board. The itemization must include the date on which the committee made or became obligated to make the expenditure or disbursement, the name and address of the vendor that provided the service or item purchased, and a description of the service or item purchased, including an explanation of how the expenditure was used. Expenditures and noncampaign disbursements must be listed on the report alphabetically by vendor. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.27, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Political party and dissolving principal campaign committee limit. A candidate must not permit the candidate's principal campaign committee to accept contributions from any political party units or dissolving principal campaign committees in aggregate in excess of ten times the amount that may be contributed to that candidate as set forth in subdivision 1. The limitation in this subdivision does not apply to a contribution from a dissolving principal campaign committee of a candidate for the legislature to another principal campaign committee of the same candidate.new text begin The limitation in this subdivision does not apply to an in-kind contribution for security services from any political party units, which are subject to the limitation for noncampaign disbursements in section 10A.01, subdivision 26, clause (30).new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.27, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Limited personal contributions. new text begin (a) new text end A candidate who signs an agreement under section 10A.322 may not contribute to the candidate's own campaign during a segment of an election cycle more than five times the candidate's contribution limit for that segment under subdivision 1. new text begin (b) The limitation in paragraph (a) does not apply to payments made by the candidate for the following that would otherwise be considered campaign contributions to the candidate's own campaign: new text end new text begin (1) detection-related security monitoring expenses for a candidate, including home security hardware, maintenance of home security monitoring hardware, identity theft monitoring services, and credit monitoring services; new text end new text begin (2) purchase, installation, and maintenance of structural security devices such as locks, wiring, lighting, gates, doors, and fencing so long as such devices are intended solely to provide security and not to improve the property or increase its value; and new text end new text begin (3) security services. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the exception in this paragraph, a candidate must still comply with the limitations for noncampaign disbursements in section 10A.01, subdivision 26, clauses (29) and (30). new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.275, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Exceptions. Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the following expenditures by a party unit, or two or more party units acting together are not considered contributions to or expenditures on behalf of a candidate for the purposes of section 10A.25 or 10A.27 and must not be allocated to candidates under section 10A.20, subdivision 3, paragraph (h): (1) expenditures on behalf of candidates of that party generally without referring to any of them specifically in a published, posted, or broadcast advertisement; (2) expenditures for the preparation, display, mailing, or other distribution of an official party sample ballot listing the names of three or more individuals whose names are to appear on the ballot; (3) expenditures for a telephone call, voice mail, text message, multimedia message, Internet chat message, or email when the communication includes the names of three or more individuals whose names are to appear on the ballot; (4) expenditures for a booth at a community event, county fair, or state fair that benefits three or more individuals whose names are to appear on the ballot; (5) expenditures for a political party fundraising effort on behalf of three or more candidates; or (6) expenditures for party committee staff services that benefit three or more candidatesnew text begin , including contracts with third parties for security services if the services are provided to at least three candidatesnew text end . Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 204B.06, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Address, electronic mail address, and telephone number. (a) An affidavit of candidacy must state a telephone number where the candidate can be contacted. An affidavit must also state the candidate's or campaign's nongovernment issued electronic mail address or an attestation that the candidate and the candidate's campaign do not possess an electronic mail address. Except for affidavits of candidacy for (1) judicial office, (2) the office of county attorney, or (3) county sheriff, an affidavit must also state the candidate's current address of residence as determined under section 200.031, or at the candidate's request in accordance with paragraph (c), the candidate's campaign contact address. When filing the affidavit, the candidate must present the filing officer with the candidate's valid driver's license or state identification card that contains the candidate's current address of residence, or documentation of proof of residence authorized for election day registration in section 201.061, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2); clause (3); or paragraph (d). If an original bill is shown, the due date on the bill must be within 30 days before or after the beginning of the filing period or, for bills without a due date, dated within 30 days before the beginning of the filing period. If the address on the affidavit and the documentation do not match, the filing officer must not accept the affidavit. The form for the affidavit of candidacy must allow the candidate to request, if eligible, that the candidate's address of residence be classified as private datadeleted text begin , and to provide the certification required under paragraph (c) for classification of that addressdeleted text end . (b) If an affidavit for an office where a residency requirement must be satisfied by the close of the filing period is filed as provided by paragraph (c), the filing officer must, within one business day of receiving the filing, determine whether the address provided in the affidavit of candidacy is within the area represented by the office the candidate is seeking. For all other candidates who filed for an office whose residency requirement must be satisfied by the close of the filing period, a registered voter in this state may request in writing that the filing officer receiving the affidavit of candidacy review the address as provided in this paragraph, at any time up to one day after the last day for filing for office. If requested, the filing officer must determine whether the address provided in the affidavit of candidacy is within the area represented by the office the candidate is seeking. If the filing officer determines that the address is not within the area represented by the office, the filing officer must immediately notify the candidate and the candidate's name must be removed from the ballot for that office. A determination made by a filing officer under this paragraph is subject to judicial review under section 204B.44. (c) If the candidate requests that the candidate's address of residence be classified as private data, the candidate must list the candidate's address of residence on a separate form to be attached to the affidavit. deleted text begin The candidate must also certify on the affidavit that either: (1) a police report has been submitted, an order for protection has been issued, or the candidate has a reasonable fear in regard to the safety of the candidate or the candidate's family; or (2) the candidate's address is otherwise private pursuant to Minnesota law.deleted text end The address of residence provided by a candidate who makes a request for classification on the candidate's affidavit of candidacy deleted text begin and provides the certification required by this paragraphdeleted text end is classified as private data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, but may be reviewed by the filing officer as provided in this subdivision. Sec. 16. new text begin [204B.065] CLASSIFICATION OF CERTAIN DATA. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "street address" means the name or number of the building, the name of the street on which the building is located, and any unit number. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin Street address data of individual candidates on an affidavit of candidacy or nominating petition submitted prior to May 1, 2026, is classified as nonpublic data, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 13.02, subdivision 9, or as private data on individuals, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective seven days following final enactment. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Form of petition. A nominating petition may consist of one or more separate pages each of which shall state: (a) the office sought; (b) the candidate's name deleted text begin and residence address, including street and number if anydeleted text end new text begin ; campaign website, if any; and the candidate's or campaign's nongovernment-issued email address or a statement that the candidate and the candidate's campaign do not possess an email addressnew text end ; and (c) the candidate's political party or political principle expressed in not more than three words. No candidate who files for a partisan office by nominating petition shall use the term "nonpartisan" as a statement of political principle or the name of the candidate's political party. No part of the name of a major political party may be used to designate the political party or principle of a candidate who files for a partisan office by nominating petition, except that the word "independent" may be used to designate the party or principle. A candidate who files an affidavit of candidacy to fill a vacancy in nomination for a nonpartisan office pursuant to section 204B.13, shall not state any political principle or the name of any political party on the petition. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Address. new text end new text begin "Address" means the complete mailing address, including the zip code. An individual may use either the individual's business address or home address. An association's address is the address from which the association conducts its business. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Street address. new text end new text begin "Street address" means the name or number of the building, the name of the street on which the building is located, and any unit number. new text end Sec. 20. new text begin [211A.015] ADDRESSES; DATA CLASSIFICATION. new text end new text begin For purposes of chapter 211A, the street address of individuals contained on reports and statements filed with a county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision are classified as nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, or as private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, and in addition to the subject of the data are accessible to the filer of the report or statement containing that data. The county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision may use street addresses disclosed on reports and statements to ensure compliance with this chapter. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 211A.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Information required. The report to be filed by a candidate or committee must include: (1) the name of the candidate and office sought; (2) the printed name, address, telephone number, signature, and email address or an attestation that the candidate and the candidate's campaign do not possess an email address, of the person responsible for filing the report; (3) the total cash on hand designated to be used for political purposes; (4) the total amount of contributions received and the total amount of disbursements for the period from the last previous report to five days before the current report is due; (5) if disbursements made to the same vendor exceed $100 in the aggregate during the period covered by the report, the name and address for the vendor and the amount, date, and purpose for each disbursement; and (6) the name, address, and employer, or occupation if self-employed, of any individual or entity that during the period covered by the report has made one or more contributions that in the aggregate exceed $100, and the amount and date of each contribution. deleted text begin The filing officer must restrict public access to the address of any individual who has made a contribution that exceeds $100 and who has filed with the filing officer a written statement signed by the individual that withholding the individual's address from the financial report is required for the safety of the individual or the individual's family.deleted text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Campaign material. (a) A person new text begin or committee new text end who participates in the preparation or dissemination of campaign material other than as provided in section 211B.05, subdivision 1, that does not prominently include the name and address of the person or committee causing the material to be prepared or disseminated in a disclaimer substantially in the form provided in paragraph (b) or (c) is guilty of a misdemeanor. (b) Except in cases covered by paragraph (c)new text begin or subdivision 2new text end , the required form of new text begin the new text end disclaimer is: "Prepared and paid for by deleted text begin the ....... committee, .......deleted text end new text begin (name of entity)new text end (address)new text begin .new text end " deleted text begin for material prepared and paid for by a principal campaign committee, or "Prepared and paid for by the ....... committee, ....... (address)" for material prepared and paid for by a person or committee other than a principal campaign committee.deleted text end The address must be deleted text begin eitherdeleted text end the deleted text begin committee'sdeleted text end new text begin entity'snew text end mailing addressnew text begin , an actively monitored email address,new text end or the deleted text begin committee'sdeleted text end new text begin entity'snew text end websitedeleted text begin ,deleted text end if the website includes the deleted text begin committee'sdeleted text end new text begin entity'snew text end mailing addressnew text begin or email addressnew text end . If the material is produced and disseminated without cost, the words "paid for" may be omitted from the disclaimer. (c) In the case of broadcast media, the required form of disclaimer is: "Paid for by deleted text begin the ....... committeedeleted text end new text begin (name of entity)new text end ." If the material is produced and broadcast without cost, the required form of the disclaimer is: "The deleted text begin ....... committeedeleted text end new text begin (name of entity)new text end is responsible for the content of this message." Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Independent expenditures. (a)new text begin A person or committee who participates in the preparation or dissemination of independent expenditure material that does not prominently include the name and address of the person or committee causing the material to be prepared or disseminated in a disclaimer substantially in the form provided in paragraph (b) or (c) is guilty of a misdemeanor.new text end new text begin (b) Except in cases covered by paragraph (c),new text end the required form of the disclaimer on deleted text begin a writtendeleted text end independent expenditure new text begin material new text end is: "This is an independent expenditure prepared and paid for by deleted text begin .......deleted text end (name of entity deleted text begin participating in the expendituredeleted text end ), deleted text begin .......deleted text end (address). It is not coordinated with or approved by any candidate nor is any candidate responsible for it." The address must be deleted text begin eitherdeleted text end the entity's mailing addressnew text begin , an actively monitored email address,new text end or the entity's websitedeleted text begin ,deleted text end if the website includes the entity's mailingnew text begin or emailnew text end address. When deleted text begin a writtendeleted text end independent expenditure new text begin material new text end is produced and disseminated without cost, the words "and paid for" may be omitted from the disclaimer. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The required form of the disclaimer on deleted text begin adeleted text end broadcast independent expenditure new text begin material new text end is: "This independent expenditure is paid for by deleted text begin .......deleted text end (name of entity deleted text begin participating in the expendituredeleted text end ). It is not coordinated with or approved by any candidate nor is any candidate responsible for it." When deleted text begin adeleted text end broadcast independent expenditurenew text begin materialnew text end is produced and disseminated without cost, the following disclaimer may be used: "deleted text begin .......deleted text end (name of entity deleted text begin participating in the expendituredeleted text end ) is responsible for the deleted text begin contentsdeleted text end new text begin contentnew text end of this independent expenditure. It is not coordinated with or approved by any candidate nor is any candidate responsible for it." Sec. 24. new text begin REDACTING STREET ADDRESSES; LOCAL GOVERNMENT REPORTS AND STATEMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 211A.02, subdivision 6, within seven calendar days of the effective date of this section, any local government that posts campaign finance reports or statements on the local government's website must remove the reports or statements if the report or statement includes private or nonpublic data. Prior to reposting any statement or report, the local government must redact or omit all private or nonpublic data. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 211A.02, subdivision 6, the filing officer of a local government must have all reports reposted within six months of the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 25. new text begin REDACTING STREET ADDRESSES; REPORTS AND STATEMENTS ON BOARD'S WEBSITE.new text end new text begin (a) Within seven calendar days of the effective date of this section, the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board must remove from the board's website all reports and statements that were filed in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 10A.09, 10A.20, or 10A.202. The board must redact or omit private or nonpublic data from each statement or report and repost the report to the board's website. The board must prioritize its work on reports and statements in the following order: new text end new text begin (1) reports and statements from candidates; new text end new text begin (2) reports and statements from party units; new text end new text begin (3) reports and statements from political committees, political funds, independent expenditure funds, and ballot funds; and new text end new text begin (4) all other statements and filings. new text end new text begin When the board completes its work with statements and reports from a category above, the board must post the reports and statements on the board's website. new text end new text begin (b) The board must have all reports reposted within six months of the effective date of this section. If the board is unable to comply with this timeline, the board must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over campaign finance policy why compliance was not possible, what issues must be resolved in order for the board to be in compliance, and when the board anticipates it will be able to comply. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 26. new text begin TRANSITION TO NEW AFFIDAVITS OF CANDIDACY AND NOMINATING PETITIONS.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the requirements of this act, a completed affidavit of candidacy under Minnesota Statutes, section 204B.06, or nominating petition under Minnesota Statutes, section 204B.07, submitted by a candidate is not deficient if the affidavit form or nominating petition form was printed or provided prior to the effective date of any modification required by this act. For elections occurring on or after November 4, 2026, an election official must not print, copy, or publicly distribute a blank affidavit of candidacy or nominating petition that does not include the required modification in this act. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 27. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.09, subdivision 9, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 4501.0100, subpart 2, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: S3710-2 10A.09 STATEMENTS OF ECONOMIC INTEREST. Subd. 9. Waivers. Upon written request and for good cause shown, the board may waive the requirement that an official disclose the address of real property that constitutes a secondary residence of the official. Repealed Minnesota Rule: S3710-2 4501.0100 DEFINITIONS. § Subp. 2. Address. "Address" means the complete mailing address, including the zip code. An individual may use either the person's business address or home address. An association's address is the address from which the association conducts its business.